Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1603
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Political Subdivisions Self-Funding Benefits Act, the definitions found in sections 13-1604 to 13-1613 shall be used.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 3.